Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1019
Board; proceedings; compel attendance of witnesses and production of documents; contempt proceedings authorized.

In any proceeding had before it under the provisions of Chapter 70, article 10, the board shall have authority, by subpoena, to compel the attendance of witnesses, and the production of any books, papers, records, accounts, or other documents which may be necessary to assist in a determination of any matter pending before the board. If any person shall disobey any such subpoena or refuse to testify concerning any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the district court of Lancaster County, upon application by the board, may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience to the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify therein.

Laws 1963, c. 397, § 19, p. 1266;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 54.